Nebraska, session 109, LB50.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 77-6204, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-6204 (1) The county treasurer shall distribute all revenue received
from the Department of Revenue pursuant to section 77-6203 as follows:
(a) Five percent of such revenue shall be distributed to the community
college area in which the renewable energy generation facility is located; and
(b) The remainder of such revenue shall be distributed to local taxing
entities which, but for such personal property tax exemption, would have
received distribution of personal property tax revenue from depreciable
personal property used directly in the generation of electricity using wind,
solar, biomass, or landfill gas as the fuel source.
(2) A local taxing entity's status as eligible for distribution under
subdivision (1)(b) subsection (1) of this section shall not be affected when
and if the net book value of personal property used directly in the generation
of electricity using wind, solar, biomass, or landfill gas as the fuel source
becomes zero. A local taxing entity's status as eligible for distribution under
such subdivision subsection shall be affected by the disposal of all of the
exempt depreciable personal property used directly in the generation of
electricity using wind, solar, biomass, or landfill gas as the fuel source.
(3) The distribution to each eligible local taxing entity under
subdivision (1)(b) of this section shall be calculated by determining the
amount of taxes that the eligible local taxing entity levied during the taxable
year and dividing this amount by the total tax levied by all of the eligible
local taxing entities during the year. Each eligible entity's resulting
fraction shall then be multiplied by the amount of revenue available for
distribution pursuant to subdivision (1)(b) of this section distributed to the
county treasurer by the department to determine the portion of such revenue due
each local taxing entity.
(4) The Department of Revenue shall not retain any revenue collected
pursuant to sections 77-6201 to 77-6204 for distribution, use, transfer,
pledge, or allocation to or from the General Fund.
Sec. 2. Original section 77-6204, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is repealed.
-1-